California statutes. Civil Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

1739.2.

For purposes of this title, an “original political item” is any political item produced during any electoral campaign for use in support of or in opposition to any candidate or ballot proposition before the voters in that campaign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

1739.3.

No political item which is labeled “copy” or “reproduction” at the time of sale, advertising for sale, or offering for sale shall violate Section 1739.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

1739.4.

(a) A person who offers or sells any political item in violation of this title shall be liable to the person purchasing such political item from him, who may sue to recover the consideration paid for the political item, with interest at the legal rate thereon, upon the tender of the political item.

(b) In any case in which a person knowingly offers or sells a political item in violation of this title, the person purchasing such political item may recover from the person who offers or sells such political item an amount equal to three times the amount required under subdivision (a).

(c) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability under this section unless brought within one year after discovery of the violation upon which it is based and in no event more than three years after the political item was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.1A. AUTOGRAPHED MEMORABILIA [1739.7. - 1739.7.]

1739.7.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Autographed collectible” means an item bearing the signature of a particular person that is sold or offered for sale for fifty dollars ($50) or more, excluding sales tax and shipping fees, when the dealer offers the signed item at a higher price than the dealer would charge for a comparable item without
 the signature.

(2) For purposes of this section, an autographed collectible shall be limited to the following items:

(A) Sports items, including, but not limited to, a photograph, ticket, plaque, sports program, trading card, item of sports equipment or clothing, or other sports memorabilia.

(B) Entertainment media items related to music, television, and films, including, but not limited to, a picture, photo, record, compact disc, digital video disc, ticket, program, playbill, clothing, hat, poster, toy, plaque, trading card, musical instrument, or other entertainment memorabilia. 

(3) For purposes of this section, and notwithstanding paragraph (2), an autographed collectible does not include the following items:

(A) Works of fine art, as defined by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 982 that are originals or numbered multiples, and signed by the artist or maker.

(B) Furniture and decorative objects, including works of pottery, jewelry, and design that are signed by the artist or maker.

(C) Signed books, manuscripts, and correspondence, as well as ephemera not related to sports or entertainment media.

(D) Signed numismatic items or bullion.

(4) “Consumer” means any natural person who purchases an autographed collectible from a dealer for personal, family, or household purposes. “Consumer” also includes a prospective purchaser meeting these criteria.

(5) (A) “Dealer” means a person who is in the business of selling or offering for sale autographed collectibles exclusively or nonexclusively, and sells three or more autographed collectibles in a period of 12 months. “Dealer” includes an auctioneer or auction company that sells autographed collectibles at a public auction. “Dealer” includes a person engaged in a mail-order, telephone-order, online, or television business for the sale of autographed collectibles.

(B) “Dealer” does not include any of the following:

(i) A pawnbroker licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21300) of Division 8 of the Financial Code, if the autographed collectible was acquired through a foreclosure on a collateral loan, provided that the pawnbroker does not hold himself or herself out as having knowledge
 or skill peculiar to autographed collectibles.

(ii) The person who autographed the collectible.

(6) “Limited edition” means any autographed collectible that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) A company has produced a specific quantity of an autographed collectible and placed it on the open market.

(B) The producer of the autographed collectible has posted a notice, at its primary place of business, that it will provide any consumer, upon request, with a copy of a notice that states the exact number of an autographed collectible produced in that series of limited editions.

(C) The producer makes available, upon request of a consumer, evidence that the electronic encoding, films,
 molds, or plates used to create the autographed collectible have been destroyed after the specified number of autographed collectibles have been produced.

(D) The sequence number of the autographed collectible and the number of the total quantity produced in the limited edition are printed on the autographed collectible.

(7) “Person” means any natural person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, company, trust, association, or other entity, however organized.

(8) “Representation” means any oral or written representation, including, but not limited to, a representation in an advertisement, brochure, catalog, flyer, invoice, sign, radio or television broadcast, online communication, Internet Web page, email, or other commercial or promotional material.

(9) “Auctioneer” means an auctioneer as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1812.601, or a representative or agent of an auctioneer.

(10) “Auction company” means an auction company as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1812.601, or a representative or agent of an auction company.

(b) A dealer who, in selling or offering to sell to a consumer an autographed collectible, makes a representation to a consumer that the signature on the autographed collectible is the authentic signature of a particular person in that person’s own hand, shall furnish an express warranty to the consumer at the time of sale. The dealer shall retain a copy of the express warranty for not less than seven years. The express warranty, which may be included in the bill of sale or invoice, shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Is written in at least 10-point type.

(2) Is signed by the dealer or his or her authorized agent, and contains the dealer’s true legal name, business street address, and the last four digits of the dealer’s seller’s permit account number from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, if applicable.

(3) Specifies the date of sale and the purchase price.

(4) Describes the autographed collectible and specifies the name of the person who autographed it.

(5) Expressly warrants the autographed collectible as authentic, and that the warranty is conclusively presumed to be part of the bargain. The warranty shall not be negated or limited by reason of the lack of words such as “warranty” or “guarantee” or because the dealer does
 not have a specific intent or authorization to make the warranty or because any statement relevant to the autographed collectible is or purports to be, or is capable of being, merely the dealer’s opinion.

(6) If the autographed collectible is offered as one of a limited edition, specifies (A) how the autographed collectible and edition are numbered and (B) the size of the edition and the size of any prior or anticipated future edition, if known by the dealer. If the size of the edition and the size of any prior or anticipated future edition is not known, the warranty shall contain an explicit statement to that effect.

(7) Indicates whether the dealer is surety bonded or is otherwise insured to protect the consumer against errors and omissions of the dealer and, if bonded or insured, provides proof thereof.

(8) Indicates if the autographed collectible was autographed in the presence of the dealer, and any proof thereof. Specify the date and location of, and the name of a witness to, the autograph signing, if known, and applicable.

(9) Identifies all information upon which the dealer relied when making the representation that the autographed collectible is authentic. 

(10) Indicates an identifying serial number that corresponds to an identifying number printed on the autographed collectible item, if any.

(11) Indicates whether the item was obtained or purchased from a third party.

(c) The dealer shall retain, after January 1, 2018, a record of the name and address of the third party, as described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (b). This
 third-party information may be discoverable during a civil dispute. However, nothing in this subdivision prohibits a party from objecting to a discovery request on the grounds of a right to privacy. This third-party information shall be kept on file for seven years.

(d) (1) In addition to any other right or remedy provided under existing law, including, but not limited to, any rights and remedies provided under contract law, a consumer shall have the right to cancel the contract for the purchase of an autographed collectible represented by a dealer as authentic until midnight of the third day after the day on which the consumer purchased the autographed collectible. Notice of the cancellation may be provided in person or in a written or electronic form, and is deemed effective once communicated or sent. The autographed collectible shall be returned to the dealer within 30 days of the sale in the same condition in which it
 was sold, the cost of which shall be borne by the consumer. The price paid by the consumer shall be refunded within 10 days of receipt of the returned autographed collectible. Nothing in this section prevents the parties from agreeing to cancel a contract after midnight of the third day after the day on which the consumer purchases the autographed collectible.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the following:

(A) Autographed collectibles sold by an auctioneer or auction company at auction.

(B) Autographed collectibles purchased by barter or trade of other items.

(C) Autographed collectibles sold at a trade show.

(D) Autographed collectibles sold by one dealer to another dealer.

(e) (1) No dealer shall display or offer for sale an autographed collectible unless, at the location where the autographed collectible is offered for sale and in close proximity to the autographed collectible merchandise, there is a conspicuous sign that reads as follows:
“SALE OF AUTOGRAPHED COLLECTIBLES: AS REQUIRED BY LAW, A DEALER WHO SELLS TO A CONSUMER ANY COLLECTIBLE DESCRIBED AS BEING AUTOGRAPHED MUST PROVIDE A WRITTEN EXPRESS WARRANTY AT THE TIME OF SALE AND A THREE-DAY RIGHT OF RETURN. THIS DEALER MAY BE SURETY BONDED OR OTHERWISE INSURED TO ENSURE THE AUTHENTICITY OF ANY AUTOGRAPHED COLLECTIBLE SOLD BY THIS DEALER.”

(2) This subdivision does not apply to an autographed collectible sold by an auctioneer or auction company at auction or an autographed collectible sold at a trade show.

(f) No dealer selling at a trade show, nor an auctioneer or auction company shall display or offer for sale an autographed collectible unless, at the location where the autographed collectible is offered for sale and in close proximity to the autographed collectible merchandise, there is a conspicuous sign that reads as follows:
“SALE OF AUTOGRAPHED COLLECTIBLES: AS REQUIRED BY LAW, A DEALER WHO SELLS TO A CONSUMER ANY COLLECTIBLE DESCRIBED AS BEING AUTOGRAPHED MUST PROVIDE A WRITTEN EXPRESS WARRANTY AT THE TIME OF SALE. THIS DEALER MAY BE SURETY BONDED OR OTHERWISE INSURED TO ENSURE THE AUTHENTICITY OF ANY AUTOGRAPHED COLLECTIBLE SOLD BY THIS DEALER.”

(g) Any dealer engaged in a mail-order, telephone-order, or online business for the sale of autographed collectibles:

(1) Shall include the disclosure specified in subdivision (e), in type of conspicuous size,
 in any written advertisement relating to an autographed collectible.

(2) Shall include in each television or online advertisement relating to an autographed collectible the following written onscreen message, which shall be prominently displayed, easily readable, and clearly visible for no less than five seconds, and which shall be repeated for five seconds once during each four-minute segment of the advertisement following the initial four minutes:
“A written express warranty is provided with each autographed collectible, as required by law. This dealer may be surety bonded or otherwise insured to ensure the authenticity of any autographed collectible sold by this dealer.”

(3) Shall include as part of the oral message of each radio advertisement for an autographed collectible the disclosure specified in subdivision (e).

(h) In a civil action brought by a consumer against a dealer, the following shall apply:

(1) A dealer who fails to provide an express warranty, or provides an express warranty that does not comply with all of the requirements of subdivision (b), shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), payable to the consumer.

(2) A dealer who provides a false express warranty that injures the consumer shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) payable to the consumer.

(3) A dealer who provides a false express warranty and whose act or omission amounts to gross negligence that injures the consumer, shall be subject to a civil penalty of three thousand dollars ($3,000), or an amount equal to three times actual damages, whichever is greater, payable to the
 consumer.

(4) A dealer who knowingly provides a false express warranty, or knowingly fails to provide an express warranty required by this section, and whose act or omission results in an injury to a consumer shall be subject to a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or an amount equal to five times actual damages, whichever is greater, payable to the consumer.

(5) A consumer may recover court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, interest, and expert witness fees, if applicable, pursuant to an action described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive.

(6) The remedies specified in this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other remedy that may be provided by law. The court, in its discretion, may award punitive damages based on the egregiousness of the dealer’s conduct.

(i) A dealer may be surety bonded or otherwise insured for purposes of indemnification against errors and omissions arising from the authentication, sale, or resale of autographed collectibles.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that neither the amendment to this section by Assembly Bill 1570 of the 2015–2016 Regular Session, adding an exclusion of a provider or operator of an online marketplace to the definition of a dealer, nor the amendment to this section by Assembly Bill 228 of the 2017–2018 Regular Session, removing that exclusion from the definition of a dealer, be construed to affect the decision of the Court of Appeal in Gentry v. eBay, Inc. (2002) 99 Cal.App.4th 816.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   (AB 228)   Effective October 12, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.2. SALE OF FINE PRINTS [1740. - 1745.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1740. - 1741.]

1740.

As used in this title:

(a) “Fine art multiple” or “multiple” for the purposes of this title means any fine print, photograph (positive or negative), sculpture cast, collage, or similar art object produced in more than one copy. Pages or sheets taken from books and magazines and offered for sale or sold as art objects shall be included, but books and magazines shall be excluded.

(b) “Fine print” or “print” means a multiple produced
by, but not limited to, engraving, etching, woodcutting, lithography, and serigraphy, and means multiples produced or developed from photographic negatives, or any combination thereof.

(c) “Master” is used in lieu of and has the same meaning as a printing plate, stone, block, screen, photographic negative, or mold or other process as to a sculpture, which contains an image used to produce fine art objects in multiples.

(d) “Artist” means the person who created the image which is contained in, or constitutes, the master or conceived of, and approved the image which is contained in, or constitutes, the master.

(e) Whether a multiple is “signed” or “unsigned” as these terms are used in this title relating to prints and photographs, depends upon whether or not the multiple was autographed by the artist’s own hand, and
not by mechanical means, after the multiple was produced, irrespective of whether it was signed or unsigned in the plate.

(f) “Impression” means each individual fine art multiple made by printing, stamping, casting, or any other process.

(g) “Art dealer” means a person who is in the business of dealing, exclusively or nonexclusively, in the fine art multiples to which this title is applicable, or a person who by his or her occupation holds himself or herself out as having knowledge or skill peculiar to these works, or to whom that knowledge or skill may be attributed by his or her employment of an agent or other intermediary who by his or her occupation holds himself or herself out as having that knowledge or skill. The term “art dealer” includes an auctioneer who sells these works at public auction, but excludes persons, not otherwise defined or treated as art dealers herein, who
are consignors or principals of auctioneers.

(h) “Limited edition” means fine art multiples produced from a master, all of which are the same image and bear numbers or other markings to denote the limited production thereof to a stated maximum number of multiples, or are otherwise held out as limited to a maximum number of multiples.

(i) “Proofs” means multiples which are the same as, and which are produced from the same master as, the multiples in a limited edition, but which, whether so designated or not, are set aside from and are in addition to the limited edition to which they relate.

(j) “Certificate of authenticity” means a written or printed description of the multiple which is to be sold, exchanged, or consigned by an art dealer. Every certificate shall contain the following statement:

“This is to certify that all information and the statements contained herein are true and correct.”

(k) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other entity, however organized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

This title shall apply to any fine art multiple when offered for sale or sold at wholesale or retail for one hundred dollars ($100) or more, exclusive of any frame.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1320, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Full Disclosure in the Sale of Fine Prints [1742. - 1744.9.]

1742.

(a) An art dealer shall not sell or consign a multiple into or from this state unless a certificate of authenticity is furnished to the purchaser or consignee, at his or her request, or in any event prior to a sale or consignment, which sets forth as to each multiple, the descriptive information required by Section 1744 for any period. If a prospective purchaser so requests, the certificate shall be transmitted to him or her prior to the payment or placing of an order for a multiple. If payment is made by a purchaser prior to delivery of such a multiple, this certificate shall be supplied at the time of or prior to delivery. With
respect to auctions, this information may be furnished in catalogues or other written materials which are made readily available for consultation and purchase prior to sale, provided that a bill of sale, receipt, or invoice describing the transaction is then provided which makes reference to the catalogue and lot number in which this information is supplied. Information supplied pursuant to this subdivision shall be clearly, specifically and distinctly addressed to each of the items listed in Section 1744 unless the required data is not applicable. This section is applicable to transactions by and between art dealers and others considered to be art dealers for the purposes of this title.

(b) An art dealer shall not cause a catalogue, prospectus, flyer, or other written material or advertisement to be distributed in, into, or from this state which solicits a direct sale, by inviting transmittal of payment for a specific multiple, unless it
clearly sets forth, in close physical proximity to the place in such material where the multiple is described, the descriptive information required by Section 1744 for any time period. In lieu of this required information, the written material or advertising may set forth the material contained in the following quoted passage, or the passage itself, if the art dealer then supplies the required information prior to or with delivery of the multiple. The nonobservance of the terms within the following passage shall constitute a violation of this title: 

“California law provides for disclosure in writing of information concerning certain fine prints, photographs, and sculptures prior to effecting a sale of them. This law requires disclosure of such matters as the identity of the artist, the artist’s signature, the medium, whether the multiple is a reproduction, the time when the multiple was produced, use of the plate which produced the multiple, and the number of
multiples in a “limited edition.” If a prospective purchaser so requests, the information shall be transmitted to him or her prior to payment, or the placing of an order for a multiple. If payment is made by a purchaser prior to delivery of the multiple, this information will be supplied at the time of or prior to delivery, in which case the purchaser is entitled to a refund if, for reasons related to matter contained in such information, he or she returns the multiple in the condition in which received, within 30 days of receiving it. In addition, if after payment and delivery, it is ascertained that the information provided is incorrect, the purchaser may be entitled to certain remedies, including refund upon return of the multiple in the condition in which received.” 

This requirement is not applicable to general written material or advertising which does not constitute an offer to effect a specific sale.

(c) In each place of business in the state where an art dealer is regularly engaged in sales of multiples, the art dealer shall post in a conspicuous place, a sign which, in a legible format, contains the information included in the following passage: 

“California law provides for the disclosure in writing of certain information concerning prints, photographs, and sculpture casts. This information is available to you, and you may request to receive it prior to purchase.” 

(d) If an art dealer offering multiples by means of a catalogue, prospectus, flyer or other written material or advertisement distributed in, into or from this state disclaims knowledge as to any relevant detail referred to in Section 1744, he or she shall so state specifically and categorically with regard to each such detail to the end that the purchaser shall be enabled to judge the degree of uniqueness or
scarcity of each multiple contained in the edition so offered. Describing the edition as an edition of “reproductions” eliminates the need to furnish further informational details unless the edition was allegedly published in a signed, numbered, or limited edition, or any combination thereof, in which case all of the informational details are required to be furnished.

(e) Whenever an artist sells or consigns a multiple of his or her own creation or conception, the artist shall disclose the information required by Section 1744, but an artist shall not otherwise be regarded as an art dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 819, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1742.6.

Any charitable organization which conducts a sale or auction of fine art multiples shall be exempt from the disclosure requirements of this title if it posts in a conspicuous place, at the site of the sale or auction, a disclaimer of any knowledge of the information specified in Section 1744, and includes such a disclaimer in a catalogue, if any, distributed by the organization with respect to the sale or auction of fine art multiples. If a charitable organization uses or employs an art dealer to conduct a sale or auction of fine art multiples, the art dealer shall be subject to all disclosure requirements otherwise required of an art dealer under this
title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1320, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1744.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and otherwise in this title, a certificate of authenticity containing the following informational details shall be required to be supplied in all transactions covered by subdivisions (a), (b), and (e) of Section 1742:

(1) The name of the artist.

(2) If the artist’s name appears on the multiple, a statement whether the multiple was signed by the artist.

If the multiple was not signed by the artist, a
statement of the source of the artist’s name on the multiple, such as whether the artist placed his signature on the multiple or on the master, whether his name was stamped or estate stamped on the multiple or on the master, or was from some other source or in some other manner placed on the multiple or on the master.

(3) A description of the medium or process, and where pertinent to photographic processes, the material used in producing the multiple, such as whether the multiple was produced through the etching, engraving, lithographic, serigraphic, or a particular method or material used in photographic developing processes. If an established term, in accordance with the usage of the trade, cannot be employed accurately to describe the medium or process, a brief, clear description shall be made.

(4) If the multiple or the image on or in the master constitutes, as to prints and
photographs, a photomechanical or photographic type of reproduction, or as to sculptures a surmoulage or other form of reproduction of sculpture cases, of an image produced in a different medium, for a purpose other than the creation of the multiple being described, a statement of this information and the respective mediums.

(5) If paragraph (4) is applicable, and the multiple is not signed, a statement whether the artist authorized or approved in writing the multiple or the edition of which the multiple being described is one.

(6) If the purported artist was deceased at the time the master was made which produced the multiple, this shall be stated.

(7) If the multiple is a “posthumous” multiple, that is, if the master was created during the life of the artist but the multiple was produced after the artist’s death,
this shall be stated.

(8) If the multiple was made from a master which produced a prior limited edition, or from a master which constitutes or was made from a reproduction or surmoulage of a prior multiple or the master which produced the prior limited edition, this shall be stated as shall the total number of multiples, including proofs, of all other editions produced from that master.

(9) As to multiples produced after 1949, the year, or approximate year, the multiple was produced shall be stated. As to multiples produced prior to 1950, state the year, approximate year or period when the master was made which produced the multiple and when the particular multiple being described was produced. The requirements of this subdivision shall be satisfied when the year stated is approximately accurate.

(10) Whether the
edition is being offered as a limited edition, and if so: (i) the authorized maximum number of signed or numbered impressions, or both, in the edition; (ii) the authorized maximum number of unsigned or unnumbered impressions, or both, in the edition; (iii) the authorized maximum number of artist’s, publisher’s or other proofs, if any, outside of the regular edition; and (iv) the total size of the edition.

(11) Whether or not the master has been destroyed, effaced, altered, defaced, or canceled after the current edition.

(b) If the multiple is part of a limited edition, and was printed after January 1, 1983, the statement of the size of the limited edition, as stated pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 1744 shall also constitute an express warranty that no additional multiples of the same image, including proofs, have been produced in this or in any other
limited edition.

(c) If the multiple was produced in the period from 1950 to the effective date of this section, the information required to be supplied need not include the information required by paragraphs (5) and (8) of subdivision (a).

(d) If the multiple was produced in the period from 1900 to 1949, the information required to be supplied need only consist of the information required by paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (9) of subdivision (a).

(e) If the multiple was produced before the year 1900, the information to be supplied need only consist of the information required by paragraphs (1), (3), and (9) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 819, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1744.7.

Whenever an art dealer furnishes the name of the artist pursuant to Section 1744 for any time period after 1949, and otherwise furnishes information required by any of the subdivisions of Section 1744 for any time period, as to transactions including offers, sales, or consignments made to other than art dealers, and to other art dealers, such information shall be a part of the basis of the bargain and shall create express warranties as to the information provided. Such warranties shall not be negated or limited because the art dealer in the written instrument did not use formal words such as “warrant” or “guarantee” or because the art dealer did not
have a specific intention or authorization to make a warranty or because any required statement is, or purports to be, or is capable of being merely the seller’s opinion. The existence of a basis in fact for information warranted by virtue of this subdivision shall not be a defense in an action to enforce such warranty. However, with respect to photographs and sculptures produced prior to 1950, and other multiples produced prior to 1900, as to information required by paragraphs (3), (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1744, the art dealer shall be deemed to have satisfied this section if a reasonable basis in fact existed for the information provided. When information is not supplied as to any subdivision or paragraph of Section 1744 because not applicable, this shall constitute the express warranty that the paragraph is not applicable.

Whenever an art dealer disclaims knowledge as to a particular item about which information is required, such disclaimer
shall be ineffective unless clearly, specifically, and categorically stated as to the particular item and contained in the physical context of other language setting forth the required information as to a specific multiple.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1320, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1744.9.

(a) An artist or art dealer who consigns a multiple to an art dealer for the purpose of effecting a sale of the multiple, shall have no liability to a purchaser under this article if the consignor, as to the consignee, has complied with the provisions of this title.

(b) When an art dealer has agreed to sell a multiple on behalf of a consignor, who is not an art dealer, or an artist has not consigned a multiple to an art dealer but the art dealer has agreed to act as the agent for an artist for the purpose of supplying the information required by this title, the art
dealer shall incur the liabilities of other art dealers prescribed by this title, as to a purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1320, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Remedies and Penalties [1745. - 1745.5.]

1745.

(a) An art dealer, including a dealer consignee, who offers or sells a multiple in, into or from this state without providing the certificate of authenticity required in Sections 1742 and 1744 of this title for any time period, or who provides information which is mistaken, erroneous or untrue, except for harmless errors, such as typographical errors, shall be liable to the purchaser of the multiple. The art dealer’s liability shall consist of the consideration paid by the purchaser for the multiple, with interest at the legal rate thereon, upon the return of the multiple in the condition in which received by the purchaser.

(b) In any case in which an art dealer, including a dealer consignee, willfully offers or sells a multiple in violation of this title, the person purchasing such multiple may recover from the art dealer, including a dealer consignee, who offers or sells such multiple an amount equal to three times the amount required under subdivision (a).

(c) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability under this section unless brought within one year after discovery of the violation upon which it is based and in no event more than three years after the multiple was sold.

(d) In any action to enforce any provision of this title, the court may allow the prevailing purchaser the costs of the action together with reasonable attorneys’ and expert witnesses’ fees. In the event, however, the court determines that an action to
enforce was brought in bad faith, it may allow such expenses to the seller as it deems appropriate.

(e) These remedies shall not bar or be deemed inconsistent with a claim for damages or with the exercise of additional remedies otherwise available to the purchaser.

(f) In any proceeding in which an art dealer relies upon a disclaimer of knowledge as to any relevant information set forth in Section 1744 for any time period, such disclaimer shall be effective unless the claimant is able to establish that the art dealer failed to make reasonable inquiries, according to the custom and usage of the trade, to ascertain the relevant information or that such relevant information would have been ascertained as a result of such reasonable inquiries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 819, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.5.

(a) Any person performing or proposing to perform an act in violation of this title within this state may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Actions for injunction pursuant to this title may be prosecuted by the following persons:

(1) The Attorney General.

(2) Any district attorney.

(3) Any city attorney.

(4) With the consent of the district attorney, a city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint, or upon the complaint of any board, officer, person, corporation, or association.

(5) Any person acting in his or her own interests, or in the interests of the members of a corporation or association, or in the interests of the general public.

(c) Any person who violates any provision of this title may also be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, which may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or any city attorney, and, with the consent of the
district attorney, by a city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor in any court of competent jurisdiction.

If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the General Fund. If brought by a district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered.

(d) Any person who violates any provision of this title may also be liable for a civil penalty surcharge not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation which shall be assessed
and recovered in the manner provided in subdivision (c). Any penalty surcharge collected shall be applied to the costs of enforcing this title by the prosecuting officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 819, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.2A. VIOLENT VIDEO GAMES [1746. - 1746.5.]

1746.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Minor” means any natural person who is under 18 years of age.

(b) “Person” means any natural person, partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(c) “Video game” means any electronic amusement device that utilizes a computer, microprocessor, or similar
 electronic circuitry and its own monitor, or is designed to be used with a television set or a computer monitor, that interacts with the user of the device.

(d) (1) “Violent video game” means a video game in which the range of options available to a player includes killing, maiming, dismembering, or sexually assaulting an image of a human being, if those acts are depicted in the game in a manner that does either of the following:

(A) Comes within all of the following descriptions:

(i) A reasonable person, considering the game as a whole, would find appeals to a deviant or morbid interest of minors.

(ii) It is patently offensive to prevailing standards in the community as to what is suitable for minors.

(iii) It causes the game, as a whole, to lack serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for minors.

(B) Enables the player to virtually inflict serious injury upon images of human beings or characters with substantially human characteristics in a manner which is especially heinous, cruel, or depraved in that it involves torture or serious physical abuse to the victim.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Cruel” means that the player intends to virtually inflict a high degree of pain by torture or serious physical abuse of the victim in addition to killing the victim.

(B) “Depraved” means that the player relishes the virtual killing or
 shows indifference to the suffering of the victim, as evidenced by torture or serious physical abuse of the victim.

(C) “Heinous” means shockingly atrocious. For the killing depicted in a video game to be heinous, it must involve additional acts of torture or serious physical abuse of the victim as set apart from other killings.

(D) “Serious physical abuse” means a significant or considerable amount of injury or damage to the victim’s body which involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, substantial disfigurement, or substantial impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty. Serious physical abuse, unlike torture, does not require that the victim be conscious of the abuse at the time it is inflicted. However, the player must specifically intend the abuse apart from the killing.
